Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4421
Bonds; signatures; validity.

If any of the officers whose signatures appear on any bonds issued under the Good Life District Economic Development Act cease to be such officers before the delivery of such obligations, such signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes to the same extent as if such officers had remained in office until such delivery.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 14.